Tennessee, session 114, SB2518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-2-202(a), is amended by deleting
the language "each January 1 thereafter" and substituting instead the language "each February
15 thereafter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2518
012039
- 1 -